Arkansas, session 2025, HB1816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 80, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-80-123. Artificial intelligence in healthcare prohibition —
Exemption — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that
can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing real or virtual environments;
(2)(A) "Health benefit plan" means:
(i) An individual, blanket, or group plan, or a
policy or contract for healthcare services offered, issued, renewed,
*JMB178*
03/17/2025 8:48:28 AM JMB178

HB1816
delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer; and
(ii) A health benefit program receiving state or
federal appropriations from the State of Arkansas, including the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program or
any successor program.
(B) "Health benefit plan" includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(C) "Health benefit plan" does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan; or
(x) A long-term-care-only plan;
(3)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an insurance company, hospital
and medical service corporation, or health maintenance organization that
issues or delivers health benefit plans in this state and is subject to:
(i) The insurance laws of this state;
(ii) Section 23-75-101 et seq., pertaining to
hospital and medical service corporations; or
(iii) Section 23-76-101 et seq., pertaining to
health maintenance organizations.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include an entity that
provides only dental benefits or eye and vision care benefits;
03/17/2025 8:48:28 AM JMB178

HB1816
(4) "Healthcare provider" means an individual or entity that is
licensed in this state to provide healthcare services; and
(5) "Quality assurance laboratory" means an entity or facility
that tests and evaluates the performance of artificial intelligence and
ensures that the artificial intelligence meets high standards for accuracy,
reliability, safety, and ethical considerations.
(b) A healthcare provider or a healthcare insurer shall not use
artificial intelligence in the delivery of healthcare services or for the
generation of medical records unless the artificial intelligence is approved
by the United States Food and Drug Administration and verified by a quality
assurance laboratory.

























03/17/2025 8:48:28 AM JMB178